Hawaii statutes.
§554G-5 Trust instrument. (a) A trust
instrument shall be irrevocable and shall expressly incorporate the laws of
this State governing the validity, construction, and administration of the
trust.

(b) The trustee, in its discretion, may
terminate any trust if and when its fair market value has declined to the
extent that would make it uneconomical, imprudent, or unwise to continue to
retain the trust, and shall pay and distribute the trust to the persons
entitled to mandatory or discretionary income distributions as the trustee in
the trustee's absolute discretion shall decide.

(c) A trust instrument shall not be deemed
revocable on account of the inclusion of:

(1) A transferor's power to veto a distribution from
the trust;

(2) A power of appointment other than a power to
appoint to the transferor, the transferor's creditors, the transferor's estate,
or the creditors of the transferor's estate that may be exercised by will or
other written instrument of the transferor effective only upon the transferor's
death;

(3) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of
income, including rights to income retained in the trust instrument;

(4) The transferor's annual receipt of a percentage
not to exceed five per cent of the initial value of the trust assets or its
value determined from time to time pursuant to the trust instrument or of a
fixed amount that on an annual basis does not exceed five per cent of the
initial value of the trust assets;

(5) The transferor's potential or actual receipt or
use of the trust's principal due to the trustee acting:

(A) In the trustee's discretion;

(B) Pursuant to a provision in the trust
instrument that governs the distribution of principal and that does not confer
upon the transferor a substantially unfettered right to the receipt or use of
the principal; or

(C) At the direction of an advisor described
in section 554G-4.5 who is acting:

(i) In the advisor's discretion;

(ii) Pursuant to a provision in the trust
instrument that governs the distribution of principal and does not confer upon
the transferor a substantially unfettered right to the receipt or use of the
principal; or

(iii) Pursuant to the transferor's determination
under section 554G-4.5(c) of a dispute, deadlock, or difference of opinion in
favor of the advisor;

provided that for purposes of this
paragraph, a trustee is presumed to have discretion with respect to the
distribution of principal unless that discretion is expressly denied to the
trustee by the terms of the trust instrument;

(6) The transferor's right to remove a trustee or
advisor and to appoint a new trustee or advisor;

(7) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of
income or principal to pay income taxes due on income of the trust if the trust
instrument includes a provision allowing or directing the use of trust funds to
pay income taxes due, or if the trustee acts in the trustee's discretion to
allow payment of income taxes due on the trust income;

(8) A trustee's authority pursuant to discretion,
direction, or the transferor's exercise of a testamentary power of appointment
to pay all or any part of the transferor's debts outstanding at the time of the
transferor's death, the expenses of administering the transferor's estate, or
any estate or inheritance tax imposed on or with respect to the transferor's
estate;

(9) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of
income or principal from a charitable remainder unitrust or charitable
remainder annuity trust, as those terms are defined in section 664 of the
Internal Revenue Code and any successor provision; and the transferor's right,
at any time and from time to time by written instrument delivered to the
trustee, to release the transferor's retained interest in the trust, in whole
or in part, in favor of one or more charitable organizations with a succeeding
beneficial interest in the trust;

(10) The transferor's potential or actual receipt of
income or principal from a grantor-retained annuity trust or grantor-retained
unitrust, pursuant to title 26 Code of Federal Regulations section 25.2702-3
and any successor provision, or the transferor's receipt each year of a
percentage specified in the governing instrument of the initial value of the
trust assets or their value determined from time to time pursuant to the
governing instrument; provided that the percentage received does not exceed
five per cent; or

(11) The transferor's potential or actual use of real
property held under a qualified personal residence trust, as described in title
26 Code of Federal Regulations section 25.2702-5(c) and any successor
provision, or the transferor's possession and enjoyment of a qualified annuity
interest, as described in title 26 Code of Federal Regulations section 25.2702-5(c)(8)
and any successor provision thereto.

(d) A trust instrument may provide that the
interest of a beneficiary of the trust, including a beneficiary who is the
transferor of the trust, may not be transferred, assigned, pledged, or
mortgaged, whether voluntarily or involuntarily, before the trustee actually
distributes the property or income to the beneficiary. Any provision of this
type contained in the trust instrument shall be deemed to be a restriction on
the transfer of the transferor's beneficial interest in the trust that is
enforceable under applicable nonbankruptcy law within the meaning of title 11
United States Code section 541(c)(2) of the Bankruptcy Code or any successor
provision.

(e) If a trustee of a trust existing prior to
the enactment of this chapter proposes to make a permitted transfer, but the trust
instrument does not contain a power of appointment that conforms to section
554G-5(c)(2), the trustee may deliver an irrevocable written election to have
section 554G-5(c)(2) apply to the trust and the nonconforming powers of
appointment shall be deemed modified to the extent necessary to conform with
section 554G-5(c)(2). The irrevocable written election shall include a
description of the original transferor's powers of appointment as modified, and
the original transferor's written consent to the modification. Consent of the
original transferor to a modification of powers of appointment shall not be
considered to be a permitted transfer.

(f) If, in any action brought against a
trustee of a trust that results from a permitted transfer, a court declines to
apply the law of this State in determining the validity, construction, or
administration of the trust or the effect of a spendthrift provision of the
trust, the trustee, immediately upon the court's action and without the further
order of any court, shall cease to be trustee of the trust and a successor
trustee shall succeed as trustee in accordance with the terms of the trust
instrument. If the trust instrument does not provide for a successor trustee
or does not provide for an advisor or protector with powers to appoint
successor trustees, a Hawaii court of competent jurisdiction shall appoint a
successor permitted trustee upon the application of any beneficiary of the
trust under any terms and conditions that the court determines to be consistent
with the purposes of the trust and with this chapter. Upon the removal of a
trustee pursuant to this section, the trustee who has been removed shall have
no power or authority other than to convey the trust property to the successor
trustee. [L 2010, c 182, pt of §2; am L 2011, c 161, §5]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next